Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.195.060

Private schools must report attendance.

The administrative or executive authority of every private school in this state must report to the superintendent of public instruction on or before the thirtieth day of June in each year, on forms to be furnished, such information as may be required by the superintendent of public instruction, to make complete the records of education work pertaining to all children residing within the state.

[ 2018 c 177 s 203; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 70; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 111; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.48.055. Prior: 1933 c 28 s 14; 1913 c 158 s 1; 1909 c 97 p 313 s 6; RRS s 4876. Formerly RCW 28A.48.055, 28.48.055, 28.27.020.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: See note following RCW 28A.305.905.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.